Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
PART 3 Temporary Guardianship of Minors

29-2-5.
Petitions for temporary guardianship; requirements of petition.

A petition to be appointed the temporary guardian of a minor may be filed by an individual who has physical custody of the minor.

The petition shall be filed in the probate court of the county of domicile of the petitioner; however, if the petitioner is not a domiciliary of this state, the petition may be filed in the probate court of the county where the minor is found.

A petition for the appointment of a temporary guardian shall include the following:

The name, address, and date of birth of the minor;

The name and address of the petitioner and the petitioner’s relationship to the minor, if any;

A statement that the petitioner has physical custody of the minor and:

Is domiciled in the county in which the petition is being filed; or

Is not a domiciliary of this state and the petition is being filed in the county where the minor is found;

The name, address, and county of domicile of any living parent of the minor and a statement of whether one or both of the parents is the minor’s natural guardian;

A statement of whether one or both of the parents have consented in a notarized writing to the appointment of the petitioner as temporary guardian and, if so, that the consents are attached to the petition;

If the sole parent or both parents have not consented to the appointment of the temporary guardian, a statement of the circumstances that give rise to the need for the appointment of a temporary guardian; and

The reason for any omission in the petition for temporary guardianship in the event full particulars are lacking.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 3/SB 534.

Law reviews.

For annual survey article discussing wills, trusts and administration of estates, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 481 (2000).

For article, “Wills, Trusts & Administration of Estates,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (2001).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 423 (2006).

29-2-6.
Parental consent to temporary guardianship; failure to consent; minor’s preference; transfer to juvenile court.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this Code section, if the sole parent or both parents of the minor have consented to the appointment of the temporary guardian, as evidenced by notarized written consents attached to the petition, the court shall grant the petition without further notice or hearing and shall issue letters of guardianship to the petitioner.

If one or both of the parents of the minor have not consented to the appointment of the temporary guardian, notice of the petition shall be given to any parent who has not consented.

The notice shall be by personal service if the parent resides in this state at a known address; by first-class mail if the parent resides outside this state at a known address; or by publication for two weeks in the official county legal organ for the county in which the petition is filed if no address is known.

The notice shall state that the parent is entitled to object either to the establishment of a temporary guardianship or to the selection of the petitioner as temporary guardian, or both.

The notice shall require that any objection be filed in writing with the court within ten days of the personal service, within 14 days of the mailing of the notice, or within ten days of the date of the second publication of the notice.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this Code section, if no parent who is entitled to notice under subsection (b) of this Code section files a timely objection to the petition, the court shall grant the petition without further notice or hearing and shall issue letters of guardianship to the petitioner.

If a natural guardian of the minor files a timely objection to the establishment of the temporary guardianship, the court shall dismiss the petition. If a natural guardian files a timely objection to the selection of the petitioner as temporary guardian, the court shall hold a hearing to determine who shall serve as temporary guardian.

If a parent who is not a natural guardian files a timely objection to the establishment of the temporary guardianship or to the selection of the petitioner as temporary guardian, the court shall hold a hearing to determine all matters at issue.

In all hearings held pursuant to this Code section, the standard for determination for all matters at issue shall be the best interests of the minor, as determined in accordance with Code Section 15-11-26 and other applicable Georgia law. As to the selection of the temporary guardian, the preference of the minor may be heard.

In all proceedings under this Code section, the court may, in its discretion, enter an order transferring the petition to the juvenile court, which shall, after notice and hearing, determine whether the temporary guardianship is in the best interests of the minor.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, an order by the court transferring the petition to the juvenile court pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be a proper order of the court under paragraph (4) of Code Section 15-11-11.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 198, § 1/HB 464.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, designated the existing provisions of subsection (f) as paragraphs (f)(1) and (f)(2); substituted “best interests of the minor, as determined in accordance with Code Section 15-11-26 and other applicable Georgia law” for “best interest of the minor” in paragraph (f)(1); in paragraph (f)(2), substituted “the court, may, in its discretion, enter an order transferring the petition to the juvenile court,” for “the court has the option to refer the petition to the juvenile court” and substituted “best interests of the minor” for “best interest of the minor”; and added paragraph (f)(3).

Law reviews.

For annual survey article discussing wills, trusts and administration of estates, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 481 (2000).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 423 (2006).

29-2-7.
Powers of temporary guardians; medical insurance coverage for minors.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a temporary guardian shall be entitled to exercise any of the powers of a natural guardian. The court in its discretion may waive the requirement that a temporary guardian file the personal status reports that are required by paragraph (8) of subsection (b) of Code Section 29-2-21.

If a temporary guardian, in writing, assumes the obligation to support the minor while the temporary guardianship is in effect, to the extent that no other sources of support are available, then for purposes of obtaining medical insurance coverage for the minor the temporary guardianship shall be deemed to be a permanent guardianship.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Law reviews.

For annual survey article discussing wills, trusts and administration of estates, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 481 (2000).

For article, “Wills, Trusts & Administration of Estates,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (2001).

29-2-8.
Termination of temporary guardianship; petition for termination of guardianship.

A temporary guardianship shall terminate on the date upon which the earliest of the following occurs: the minor reaches age 18, the minor is adopted, the minor is emancipated, the minor dies, the temporary guardian dies, letters of guardianship are issued to a permanent or testamentary guardian, or a court order terminating the temporary guardianship is entered. Proof of adoption, death, or emancipation shall be filed with the court and the court may order a hearing in an appropriate case.

Either natural guardian of the minor may at any time petition the court to terminate a temporary guardianship; provided, however, that notice of such petition shall be provided to the temporary guardian. If no objection to the termination is filed by the temporary guardian within ten days of the notice, the court shall order the termination of the temporary guardianship. If the temporary guardian objects to the termination of the temporary guardianship within ten days of the notice, the court shall have the option to hear the objection or transfer the records relating to the temporary guardianship to the juvenile court, which shall determine, after notice and hearing, whether a continuation or termination of the temporary guardianship is in the best interest of the minor.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-2-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

Law reviews.

For annual survey article discussing wills, trusts and administration of estates, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 481 (2000).

For article, “Wills, Trusts & Administration of Estates,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 499 (2001).